Maryland, session 2025, SB0322.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–301.
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
(14) Violation of a provision of:
(xlii) Section 12–6C–09.1 of the Health Occupations Article; [or]
(xliii) Title 14, Subtitle 48 of this article; or
(XLIV) SECTION 13–411.1(C)(2) OF THE TRANSPORTATION
ARTICLE; OR
Article – Transportation
13–411.
(c) (1) At all times, each registration plate shall be:
(i) Maintained free from foreign materials, including registration
plate covers as defined in § 13–411.1 of this subtitle, and in a condition to be clearly legible;
and
(ii) Securely fastened to the vehicle for which it is issued:
1. In a horizontal position;

SENATE BILL 322 3
2. In a manner that prevents the plate from swinging; and
3. In a place and position to be clearly visible.
(2) For a violation involving the placement of an object framing or
bordering the edges of a registration plate, a police officer may enforce this subsection only
as a secondary action when the police officer detains a driver of a motor vehicle for a
suspected violation of another provision of the Code.
13–411.1.
(a) In this section, “registration plate cover” means any tinted, colored, painted,
marked, [clear,] or illuminated object that is designed to:
(1) [Cover] OBSCURE OR BLOCK any of the characters of a vehicle’s
registration plate; or
(2) Distort a recorded image of any of the characters of a vehicle’s
registration plate recorded by a traffic control signal monitoring system under § 21–202.1
of this article.
(b) A person may not sell or offer for sale a registration plate cover.
(c) (1) A person may not advertise for the purpose of promoting the sale of
registration plate covers.
(2) A PERSON MAY NOT ADVERTISE FOR OR PROMOTE THE SALE OF
AN UNLAWFUL REGISTRATION PLATE COVER BY FALSELY CLAIMING THAT THE
REGISTRATION PLATE COVER IS LAWFUL IN THE STATE.
(D) A VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (C)(2) OF THIS SECTION IS:
(1) AN UNFAIR, ABUSIVE, OR DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE WITHIN
THE MEANING OF TITLE 13 OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE; AND
(2) IN ADDITION TO THE PENALTY UNDER § 27–101 OF THIS ARTICLE,
SUBJECT TO THE ENFORCEMENT AND PENALTY PROVISIONS CONTAINED IN TITLE
13 OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE.
21–1112.1.
(a) A person may not obscure or modify any vehicle registration plate [with intent
to avoid] IN A MANNER THAT MAY PREVENT identification.

SENATE BILL 322
(b) A violation of this section is a moving violation for the purpose of the
assessment of points under § 16–402 of this article.
(C) A POLICE OFFICER MAY ENFORCE THIS SECTION ONLY AS A SECONDARY
ACTION WHEN THE POLICE OFFICER DETAINS A DRIVER OF A MOTOR VEHICLE FOR
A SUSPECTED VIOLATION OF ANOTHER PROVISION OF THE CODE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.